Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Article 5. Miscellaneous Provisions.

403A.501.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing the Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 28, effective June 29, 2021.

403A.502.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15

U.S.C. sec. 7001

et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15

U.S.C. sec. 7001

(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15

U.S.C. sec. 7003(b)

.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 29, effective June 29, 2021.

403A.503.
Savings clause.

This chapter does not affect the validity of a temporary court order concerning custodial responsibility during deployment which was entered before June 29, 2021.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 30, effective June 29, 2021.